Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0275.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Governing body" means the body in which the legislative powers of a municipality are vested. (b) "Municipality" means a county, city, village, or township. (c) "Natural gas infrastructure" means any equipment, facility, or building used in the transportation or distribution of natural gas. Sec. 3. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the governing body of a municipality shall not adopt or enforce an ordinance, a resolution, or a policy that prohibits any of the following: (a) The use of natural gas in that municipality. (b) The installation of natural gas infrastructure in that municipality. Sec. 5. Any provision in an ordinance, a resolution, or a policy adopted by the governing body of a municipality on or after the effective date of this act that violates section 3 is void and unenforceable.